Wyoming, session 2026, HB0122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-25-701 through 35-25-709 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 7
WYOMING RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION
35-25-701. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Rural Health Transformation Sustainability, Accountability
and Fiscal Protection Act."
35-25-702. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Advisory committee" means the Wyoming rural
health transformation advisory committee created in W.S.
35-25-703;
(ii) "Annual required distribution" means:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June
30, 2036, the greater of:
(I) The total program income, as
defined in 2 C.F.R. § 200.1, earned during the previous
fiscal year that is required to be expended under federal
statutes, federal regulations or the terms and conditions
of the Wyoming rural health transformation plan; or
(II) Four percent (4%) of the
cumulative total of funds deposited into the perpetuity
fund since inception, as calculated on the first day of
each fiscal year.
(B) Beginning July 1, 2036 and each fiscal
year thereafter, four percent (4%) of the previous five (5)
year average market value of the perpetuity fund, as
calculated on the first day of each fiscal year.
(iii) "Department" means the department of
health;
(iv) "Perpetuity fund" means the Wyoming rural
health transformation perpetuity fund created in W.S.
35-25-704;
(v) "Purpose-dedicated share" means a discrete
fractional interest of the annual required distribution
allocated to a specific allowable perpetuity fund
expenditure authorized in W.S. 35-25-706;
(vi) "Rural health transformation funds" means
federal funds awarded to the state of Wyoming under the
federal rural health transformation program established by
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
section 71401 of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act,
P.L. 119-21;
(vii) "Wyoming rural health transformation plan"
means the rural health transformation program application
submitted to and approved by the federal government
pursuant to section 71401 of the federal One Big Beautiful
Bill Act, P.L. 119-21, and shall include any terms and
conditions specified in any associated notice of award,
cooperative agreement or similar federal instrument
governing the receipt or use of funds, and any amendments
thereto;
(viii) "Wyoming rural health transformation
program" means the program established in W.S. 35-25-705.
35-25-703. Wyoming rural health transformation
advisory committee; legislative liaisons.
(a) There is created the Wyoming rural health
transformation advisory committee. The advisory committee
shall be composed of nine (9) voting members, each of whom
shall serve for a term of four (4) years. The governor
shall make appointments and fill any vacancies for
unexpired terms. Members are eligible for reappointment.
The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.
9-1-202.
(b) The director of the department or the director's
designee and the director of the state budget department or
the director's designee shall serve as ex officio members
of the advisory committee, having the right to speak but
not to vote.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) One (1) senator appointed by the president of the
senate and one (1) representative appointed by the speaker
of the house shall serve as nonvoting legislative liaisons
to the advisory committee.
(d) The advisory committee shall select one (1) of
its voting members to serve as chairman.
(e) The advisory committee shall meet not less than
two (2) times per year.
(f) Voting members shall serve without compensation
but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties in the manner and amounts
provided by law for state employees. Legislative liaisons
shall be paid salary, per diem and mileage as provided in
W.S. 28-5-101 when attending meetings of the advisory
council.
(g) The advisory committee shall review the
operations of the perpetuity fund and provide formal
written recommendations to the department regarding the
annual required distribution and allowable perpetuity fund
expenditures. The department shall review any
recommendations from the advisory committee and provide a
written response.
(h) The advisory committee shall review and approve
each grant, award or expenditure of rural health
transformation funds in excess of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00), excluding deposits into the
perpetuity fund.
35-25-704. Wyoming rural health transformation
perpetuity fund; investment; distributions.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) There is created the Wyoming rural health
transformation perpetuity fund. The perpetuity fund shall
consist of monies designated to the fund by law and other
contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations made
to the fund.
(b) The state treasurer, or the treasurer's designee,
who shall be registered under the Investment Advisor's Act
of 1940, as amended, if required to be registered by the
terms of that act, as amended, shall invest the
unobligated, unencumbered balance of the Wyoming rural
health transformation perpetuity fund as authorized by law.
Investments of the perpetuity fund shall be in accordance
with subsection (c) of this section, if effective, and W.S.
9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and 9-4-716. All investment
earnings shall be deposited to the perpetuity fund. In
adopting investment policy statements for the perpetuity
fund, the state loan and investment board, in consultation
with the investment funds committee, shall seek to preserve
the balance of the fund in a manner that strives for the
highest possible risk-adjusted total net return consistent
with an appropriate level of safety and liquidity to
maintain a consistent annual required distribution.
(c) If this article is enacted by the legislature
pursuant to the voting requirements of article 16, section
6(a)(ii)(B) of the Wyoming constitution, the state
treasurer may invest the unobligated, unencumbered balance
of the perpetuity fund in equities, including stocks of
corporations.
(d) All monies deposited to the perpetuity fund,
including investment earnings, shall be expended only for
the allowable perpetuity fund expenditures authorized under
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the Wyoming rural health transformation program and in
accordance with the terms and conditions under which the
monies are received. Rural health transformation funds, and
investment earnings thereon, expended in violation of the
terms and conditions under which the monies are received
shall be returned by the state to the federal source from
which the monies originated.
(e) Each one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) of
principal deposited to the perpetuity fund shall be
allocated to one (1) purpose-dedicated share by the
department, or fractional value thereof if a deposit is
less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).
(f) The annual required distribution is continuously
appropriated to the Wyoming rural health transformation
expenditure account, which is hereby created. The state
treasurer shall annually credit the annual required
distribution to the expenditure account not later than
September 30 of each year. Monies in the expenditure
account shall only be expended by the department for
allowable perpetuity fund expenditures under W.S.
35-25-706, the Wyoming rural health transformation plan and
all other requirements and limitations specified in this
article. Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from
an annual required distribution, after a reasonable period
for expenditure for which the funds were continuously
appropriated, as recommended by the advisory committee and
determined by the department, shall revert to the Wyoming
rural health transformation perpetuity fund.
(g) Subject to W.S. 35-25-706(a), the total amount of
the annual required distribution expended on each allowable
perpetuity fund expenditure shall reasonably reflect the
total number of purpose-dedicated shares initially
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
allocated to that expenditure, divided by the total number
of all purpose-dedicated shares in the perpetuity fund.
35-25-705. Wyoming rural health transformation
program.
There is established the Wyoming rural health
transformation program within the department. The
department shall administer the program. The program shall
be implemented in accordance with the Wyoming rural health
transformation plan and shall be limited to the allowable
perpetuity fund expenditures authorized in W.S. 35-25-706
and the time-limited initiatives authorized in W.S.
35-25-707. The department shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement this section and the program.
35-25-706. Wyoming rural health transformation
program; allowable perpetuity fund expenditures.
(a) Subject to the availability of funds, the
department shall expend the annual required distribution
solely for the allowable perpetuity fund expenditures
authorized under this section. The allocation of
purpose-dedicated shares and annually required distribution
expenditures shall seek to achieve the percentage targets
for support, grants and awards specified in this section.
Upon a written recommendation of the advisory committee,
the department may materially deviate from the percentage
targets specified in this section to the extent necessary
to meet documented need and demonstrated demand for the
support, grants and awards specified in this section.
(b) Forty and seven-tenths percent (40.7%) of the
annual required distribution shall be allocated for the
critical access hospital basic incentive (CAHB) program.
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Under this program, the department shall provide incentive
payments to hospitals that elect to participate and that
meet service delivery requirements, subject to all of the
following:
(i) A participating hospital shall operate a
staffed twenty-four (24) hour emergency department with
stroke and trauma imaging capability, provide or operate
ground ambulance services within its service area, provide
basic labor and delivery services if annual births exceed a
threshold established by the department and participate in
the statewide health information exchange;
(ii) Incentive payments under this subsection
may include tiered payments, one (1) time grants, medical
debt relief for Wyoming residents and ongoing payments to
offset fixed costs.
(c) Twenty-six and nine-tenths percent (26.9%) of the
annual required distribution shall be allocated for
emergency medical service regionalization. After the
submission of a statewide emergency medical services
response time model to the joint labor, health and social
services interim committee as provided in paragraph (i) of
this subsection, the department shall provide incentive
payments to emergency medical service providers that elect
to participate and that meet regionalization requirements
established by rule of the department, subject to the
following:
(i) The department shall not require or
implement emergency medical service regionalization under
this subsection unless it first submits to the joint labor,
health and human services interim committee a statewide
emergency medical service response time model demonstrating
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
no increase in emergency response times, staffing
projections including volunteer impacts, inter-county
governance and authority agreements and full cost estimates
of regionalization, including long-term maintenance costs;
(ii) Eligibility for incentive payments under
this subsection shall be limited to joint applications
submitted by two (2) or more ground ambulance providers
serving a contiguous rural or frontier region;
(iii) Joint applicants shall submit a
regionalization plan to the department demonstrating
maximization of revenue sources, integration with public
safety answering points, use of interoperable equipment and
technology, reduction of administrative overhead and
commitment to community emergency medical services and
tele-crisis stabilization services;
(iv) Incentive payments under this subsection
shall include ongoing payments to offset fixed readiness
costs and grants for ambulances, interoperability equipment
and implementation of regional medical dispatch.
(d) Twenty-one and six-tenths percent (21.6%) of the
annual required distribution shall be allocated for
workforce education individual support. The department
shall administer awards to individual persons for health
care workforce education and training costs, including
tuition, fees and stipends, subject to the following:
(i) Awards under this subsection shall be used
to pay allowable education and training costs for eligible
applicants pursuing credentials in one (1) or more of the
following fields:
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Nursing, including certified nursing
assistant, licensed practical nurse, registered nurse and
advanced practice registered nurse programs;
(B) Emergency medical services, including
emergency department technician, emergency medical
responder, emergency medical technician and paramedic
programs;
(C) Clinical behavioral health professions;
(D) Physician education, including
undergraduate medical education.
(ii) As a condition of receiving an award under
this subsection, an applicant shall agree to provide health
care services in Wyoming for a minimum of five (5) years
following completion of the approved program, under terms
and conditions established by the department;
(iii) An applicant who fails to satisfy the
service obligation required under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection shall be required to repay to the department all
or a prorated portion of the award, together with any
applicable interest, as determined by rule of the
department.
(e) Ten and eight-tenths percent (10.8%) of the
annual required distribution shall be allocated for
physician post-graduate medical education (GME) individual
support. The department shall administer awards to
individuals for physician medical education, including
residency and fellowship training costs, subject to the
following:
10

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) In awarding funds under this subsection, the
department shall prioritize awards to applicants in
programs that will increase the supply of family medicine
physicians and that provide training in obstetrics or other
high-demand specialties, as determined by the department;
(ii) As a condition of receiving an award under
this subsection, an applicant shall agree to provide health
care services for a minimum of five (5) years in one (1) or
more underserved counties within the state, under terms and
conditions established by rule of the department.
35-25-707. Wyoming rural health transformation
program; time-limited initiatives; sunset.
(a) Subject to the availability of rural health
transformation funds and subsection (b) of this section,
the department is authorized to expend funds for
time-limited initiatives in amounts that seek to achieve
the following percentage targets:
(i) Thirty-six and four-tenths percent (36.4%)
of amounts available for time-limited initiatives for
integrated primary care. Expenditures under this paragraph
shall be for competitive grants to expand the number and
geographical reach of federally qualified health centers in
the state through conversion of existing facilities and
practices for the integration of primary care delivery
models that coordinate primary medical care with behavioral
health services, obstetric and gynecological care, dental
services and preventive health services;
(ii) Fifteen and one-tenths percent (15.1%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for a
technology adoption challenge program. Expenditures under
11

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
this paragraph shall be for competitive grants for health
care technology procurement. Grants under this paragraph
shall be awarded only to joint applications submitted by
two (2) or more health care providers and shall be limited
to projects that improve care delivery closer to patients'
homes, enhance interoperability and coordination among
providers and reduce administrative activity;
(iii) Nine and eight-tenths percent (9.8%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for exercise
and diet programs. Expenditures under this paragraph shall
be for competitive grants to Wyoming-based entities to
promote physical activity and healthy nutrition. Projects
that demonstrate measurable increases in participation in
exercise, outdoor recreation or evidence-based nutrition
practices shall be prioritized for the grants under this
paragraph;
(iv) Eight and two-tenths percent (8.2%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for a
statewide tele-specialist platform. Expenditures under
this paragraph shall be for the procurement and operation
of a centralized tele-specialty platform to deliver
physician-level specialty consultations to health care
providers statewide;
(v) Eight and two-tenths percent (8.2%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for
workforce education startup costs. Expenditures under this
paragraph shall be for competitive grants to support health
care workforce training programs operated by educational
institutions within the state. Grants under this paragraph
shall be awarded to recipients that commit to establishing
and maintaining a specified number of training positions
for nurses, emergency medical service personnel,
12

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
physicians, clinical behavioral health providers and other
health care professionals;
(vi) Eight and two-tenths percent (8.2%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for care
coordination. Expenditures under this paragraph shall be
for competitive grants to hospitals, health care providers
and rural health facilities to propose clinically
integrated care coordination models for one (1) or more
counties to improve the management of chronic disease among
persons who are dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid
and who are identified as high risk. Funding awarded under
this paragraph may include capped start-up costs, a
per-member, per-month care coordination payment for
assigned persons and performance-based payments tied to
demonstrated cost savings;
(vii) Four and nine-tenths percent (4.9%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for
centralized billing capacity. Expenditures under this
paragraph shall be for centralized billing and revenue
collection services for voluntarily participating emergency
medical services agencies. This centralized billing
capacity initiative may be expanded to other health care
providers if the initiative demonstrates effectiveness and
financial sustainability;
(viii) Two percent (2.0%) of amounts available
for time-limited initiatives for a nonemergency
transportation coordination platform. Expenditures under
this paragraph shall be for the procurement and operation
of a centralized nonemergency medical transportation
coordination platform to improve access to health care
appointments for seniors, persons with disabilities and
other eligible populations. The platform shall facilitate
13

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the scheduling, coordination and billing of nonemergency
transportation;
(ix) Two and six-tenths percent (2.6%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives for
administration. Expenditures under this paragraph include
any administrative costs necessary to implement the rural
health transformation program, including expenses of the
advisory committee;
(x) Four and six-tenths percent (4.6%) of
amounts available for time-limited initiatives included in
the Wyoming rural health transformation plan that are not
specifically authorized in this subsection shall be
redistributed for expenditure on the initiatives authorized
under this subsection.
(b) Upon a written recommendation of the advisory
committee, the department may materially deviate from the
percentage targets specified in subsection (a) of this
section to the extent necessary to meet documented need and
demonstrated demand for the time-limited initiatives
specified in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The authority to administer the time-limited
initiatives and any funds for the initiatives under
subsection (a) of this section shall terminate upon
exhaustion of all rural health transformation funds
appropriated or otherwise made available for the
initiatives specified in subsection (a) of this section.
35-25-708. Prohibited uses; legislative notice;
reporting.
14

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) In addition to any other limitations imposed by
state or federal law, no expenditure of rural health
transformation funds shall be made for abortions or for
specified sex-trait modification procedures, as defined in
45 C.F.R. § 156.400.
(b) Each grant, award or expenditure of rural health
transformation funds in excess of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00) shall require written approval of the
advisory committee and notice to the legislature not less
than ten (10) days prior to authorization of the grant,
award or expenditure. For authorized perpetuity fund
expenditures, the notice shall identify the proposed
recipient, amount, purpose and material terms of the grant,
award or expenditure. For time-limited initiatives,
legislative notice shall be satisfied by the department
providing written notice to the joint appropriations
committee in a manner similar to the process specified in
W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and 9-2-1013(b).
(c) The state budget department, in consultation with
the department, shall develop and maintain an electronic
reporting portal to provide current information on
expenditures and program activity of rural health
transformation funds.
35-25-709. Recipient reporting; performance and
accountability agreements; repayment.
(a) The department shall require each recipient of
funds under the Wyoming rural health transformation program
to submit reports sufficient to demonstrate compliance with
applicable state and federal requirements. At a minimum,
required reporting shall include detailed expenditure
15

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
information, performance measures and documentation
demonstrating the authorized use of funds.
(b) The department shall require each recipient
hospital, clinic, emergency medical service provider or
other health care-related organization receiving funds
under the programs authorized in W.S. 35-25-706 to enter
into a written performance and accountability agreement
with the department. At a minimum, the agreement shall
include requirements relating to:
(i) Operating margin targets;
(ii) Days cash on hand;
(iii) Liquidity ratio benchmarks;
(iv) The adoption of modernization and
efficiency practices, including improved revenue cycle
management systems;
(v) The development and implementation of a plan
to reduce unprofitable, duplicative or nonessential service
lines;
(vi) Participation in shared services, regional
collaboration or other cost-containment arrangements where
feasible; and
(vii) Submission of independent financial audits
to the department for annual collection and transmittal to
the joint appropriations committee.
(c) A recipient of funds under the Wyoming rural
health transformation program that fails to comply with a
16

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
requirement, condition or obligation imposed by statute,
rule or performance and accountability agreement, or that
fails to meet required performance targets, misuses funds,
expends funds for purposes not authorized under state or
federal law or fails or refuses to implement required
operational reforms, shall repay to the department all or a
prorated portion of the funds received, as determined by
the department. The department may recover amounts owed
under this subsection by any means authorized by law.
Section 2. The department of health shall adopt all
rules necessary to implement this act.
Section 3. During the 2026 interim, the joint labor,
health and social services interim committee shall study
policy issues identified in the Wyoming rural health
transformation plan, as defined in W.S. 35-25-702(a)(vii)
created in this act, and may prepare any legislation it
deems necessary for consideration by the legislature.
Section 4.
(a) Federal funds awarded to the state of Wyoming
under the federal rural health transformation program
established by section 71401 of the federal One Big
Beautiful Bill Act, P.L. 119-21, are appropriated to the
department of health, subject to the following:
(i) In federal fiscal year 2026, eighty percent
(80%) of funds awarded for that fiscal year shall be
deposited into the Wyoming rural health transformation
perpetuity fund, as defined in W.S. 35-25-702(a)(iv)
created in this act. Thereafter, in each subsequent federal
fiscal year, sixty-nine and five-tenths percent (69.5%) of
17

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
funds awarded in that fiscal year shall be deposited into
the Wyoming rural health transformation perpetuity fund;
(ii) In federal fiscal year 2026, twenty percent
(20%) of funds awarded for that fiscal year are
appropriated for the time-limited initiatives authorized in
W.S. 35-25-707, as created in this act. Thereafter, in
each subsequent federal fiscal year, thirty and five-tenths
percent (30.5%) of the funds awarded in that fiscal year
are appropriated for the time-limited initiatives.
18

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
19